Hawaii statutes.
§466-3 Definitions. When used in this
chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated:

"Attest" means providing
the following financial statement services:

(1) Any audit or other engagement to be performed in
accordance with the statements on auditing standards of the American Institute
of Certified Public Accountants;

(2) Any compilation or review of a financial
statement to be performed in accordance with the statements on standards for
accounting and review services of the American Institute of Certified Public
Accountants;

(3) Any examination of prospective financial
information to be performed in accordance with the statements on standards for
attestation engagements of the American Institute of Certified Public
Accountants;

(4) Any engagement to be performed in accordance with
the government auditing standards, also known as the Yellow Book, issued by the
United States Government Accountability Office; and

(5) Any engagement to be performed in accordance with
the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board.

"Board" means the state board of
public accountancy established under section 466-4.

"Certified public accountant" means
the designation given to a person licensed under section 466-5 or the law of
any other state or foreign country.

"Department" means the department of
commerce and consumer affairs.

"Director" means the director of
commerce and consumer affairs.

"Firm" means a sole
proprietorship, a corporation, a partnership, a limited liability company, or a
limited liability partnership.

"Hawaii attest work" means attest
services provided or attest reports issued by an individual or firm licensed
and authorized to practice public accountancy in this State or any other state,
to any of the following clients:

(1) An individual who is a resident of this State;

(2) A person, entity, firm, or trust that is
domiciled within this State, or whose principal or home office is physically
located within this State; or

(3) A subsidiary that has a physical presence in this
State, and has a separate, stand-alone financial statement or report issued on
that subsidiary.

"License" means the document issued
by the board to a person designated as a certified public accountant under
section 466-5, or a person licensed as a public accountant under section 466-6,
or a valid comparable certificate, registration, or license of certified public
accountant or public accountant issued after examination under the law of any
other state or foreign country, or of a permit issued under section 466-7.

"Partner" means a partner in any
general partnership, foreign general partnership, limited liability
partnership, or foreign limited liability partnership.

"Partnership" means any general
partnership, foreign general partnership, limited liability partnership, or
foreign limited liability partnership.

"Peer review" means a study,
appraisal, or review of one or more aspects of the professional work of a firm
that issues attest reports by a person or persons who hold permits to practice
public accountancy under section 466-7 or are licensed to practice public
accountancy in any other state and who are not affiliated with the firm being
reviewed.

"Permit" means a permit to actively
practice public accountancy issued under section 466-7.

"Practice of public accountancy"
means the performance or the offering to perform, by a person or firm holding
itself out to the public as a licensee, for a client or potential client of one
or more kinds of services involving the use of accounting or auditing skills,
including the issuance of reports on financial statements, or of one or more
kinds of management advisory or consulting services, or the preparation of tax
returns or the furnishing of advice on tax matters.

"Public accountant" means the
designation given to a person licensed under section 466-6, or the law of any
other state or foreign country.

"Report", when used with reference to
financial statements, means an opinion, report, or other form of language that
states or implies the measure of assurance as to the reliability of any
financial statements, and that also includes, or is accompanied by, any
statement or implication that the firm issuing it has special knowledge or
competence in accounting or auditing.

"State" means any state, territory,
or insular possession of the United States, except that "this State"
means the State of Hawaii. [L 1973, c 158, pt of §2; am L 1989, c 110, §4; am L
1992, c 202, §162; am L 1996, c 93, §2; am L 2010, c 66, §2; am L 2016, c 145,
§§1, 7]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next